en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
FLAG long
SFX DF Y 35
SFX DF 0 nen        in
SFX DF e in         e
SFX DF e innen      e
SFX DF 0 in         [^i]n
SFX DF 0 innen      [^i]n
SFX DF 0 in         [^enr]
SFX DF 0 innen      [^enr]
SFX DF 0 in         [^e]r
SFX DF 0 innen      [^e]r
SFX DF 0 in         [^r]er
SFX DF 0 innen      [^r]er
SFX DF 0 in         [^e]rer
SFX DF 0 innen      [^e]rer
SFX DF 0 in         ierer
SFX DF 0 innen      ierer
SFX DF er in         [^i]erer
SFX DF er innen      [^i]erer
SFX DF in In         in
SFX DF in Innen      in
SFX DF e In         e
SFX DF e Innen      e
SFX DF 0 In         [^i]n
SFX DF 0 Innen      [^i]n
SFX DF 0 In         [^en]
SFX DF 0 Innen      [^en]
SFX DF 0 In         [^e]r
SFX DF 0 Innen      [^e]r
SFX DF 0 In         [^r]er
SFX DF 0 Innen      [^r]er
SFX DF 0 In         [^e]rer
SFX DF 0 Innen      [^e]rer
SFX DF 0 In         ierer
SFX DF 0 Innen      ierer
SFX DF er In         [^i]erer
SFX DF er Innen      [^i]erer
#SFX DF en innen        en
#SFX DF en Innen        en


SFX DL N 12
SFX DL 0 tlich      n
SFX DL 0 tliche     n
SFX DL 0 tlicher    n
SFX DL 0 tliches    n
SFX DL 0 tlichem    n
SFX DL 0 tlichen    n
SFX DL 0 lich       [^n]
SFX DL 0 liche      [^n]
SFX DL 0 licher     [^n]
SFX DL 0 liches     [^n]
SFX DL 0 lichem     [^n]
SFX DL 0 lichen     [^n]


#SFX DH N 2
#SFX DH 0 heit       .
#SFX DH 0 heiten     .


#SFX DK N 2
#SFX DK 0 keit       .
#SFX DK 0 keiten     .


SFX DM N 10
SFX DM 0 chen       [^se]
SFX DM 0 chens      [^se]
SFX DM ass ässchen    ass
SFX DM ass ässchens   ass
SFX DM oss össchen    oss
SFX DM oss össchens   oss
SFX DM uss üsschen    uss
SFX DM uss üsschens   uss
SFX DM e chen       e
SFX DM e chens      e


SFX DA Y 46
SFX DA 0 r          e
SFX DA 0 n          e
SFX DA 0 m          e
SFX DA 0 s          e
SFX DA 0 e          [^elr]
SFX DA 0 er         [^elr]
SFX DA 0 en         [^elr]
SFX DA 0 em         [^elr]
SFX DA 0 es         [^elr]
SFX DA 0 e          [^e][rl]
SFX DA 0 er         [^e][rl]
SFX DA 0 en         [^e][rl]
SFX DA 0 em         [^e][rl]
SFX DA 0 es         [^e][rl]
SFX DA 0 e          [^u]er
SFX DA 0 er         [^u]er
SFX DA 0 en         [^u]er
SFX DA 0 em         [^u]er
SFX DA 0 es         [^u]er
SFX DA er re         uer
SFX DA er rer        uer
SFX DA er ren        uer
SFX DA er rem        uer
SFX DA er res        uer
SFX DA 0 e          [eil]el
SFX DA 0 er         [eil]el
SFX DA 0 en         [eil]el
SFX DA 0 em         [eil]el
SFX DA 0 es         [eil]el
SFX DA el le         [^eil]el
SFX DA el ler        [^eil]el
SFX DA el len        [^eil]el
SFX DA el lem        [^eil]el
SFX DA el les        [^eil]el
SFX DA lig elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA lig elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA lig eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA lig eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA lig eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA lig eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DA erig rig        [^hi]erig
SFX DA erig rige       [^hi]erig
SFX DA erig riger      [^hi]erig
SFX DA erig rigen      [^hi]erig
SFX DA erig rigem      [^hi]erig
SFX DA erig riges      [^hi]erig


SFX DC Y 88
SFX DC 0 ere        [^elr]
SFX DC 0 erer       [^elr]
SFX DC 0 eren       [^elr]
SFX DC 0 erem       [^elr]
SFX DC 0 eres       [^elr]
SFX DC 0 re         e
SFX DC 0 rer        e
SFX DC 0 ren        e
SFX DC 0 rem        e
SFX DC 0 res        e
SFX DC 0 ere        [^e][lr]
SFX DC 0 erer       [^e][lr]
SFX DC 0 eren       [^e][lr]
SFX DC 0 erem       [^e][lr]
SFX DC 0 eres       [^e][lr]
SFX DC el lere       el
SFX DC el lerer      el
SFX DC el leren      el
SFX DC el lerem      el
SFX DC el leres      el
SFX DC er rere       uer
SFX DC er rerer      uer
SFX DC er reren      uer
SFX DC er rerem      uer
SFX DC er reres      uer
SFX DC 0 ere        [^u]er
SFX DC 0 erer       [^u]er
SFX DC 0 eren       [^u]er
SFX DC 0 erem       [^u]er
SFX DC 0 eres       [^u]er
SFX DC lig eligere    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligerer   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligeren   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligerem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligeres   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC erig rigere     [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigerer    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigeren    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigerem    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigeres    [^hi]erig
SFX DC 0 est        [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 este       [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 ester      [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 esten      [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 estem      [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 estes      [kßsuxz]
SFX DC 0 st         et
SFX DC 0 ste        et
SFX DC 0 ster       et
SFX DC 0 sten       et
SFX DC 0 stem       et
SFX DC 0 stes       et
SFX DC 0 est        [^e]t
SFX DC 0 este       [^e]t
SFX DC 0 ester      [^e]t
SFX DC 0 esten      [^e]t
SFX DC 0 estem      [^e]t
SFX DC 0 estes      [^e]t
SFX DC 0 st         [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 ste        [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 ster       [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 sten       [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 stem       [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 stes       [^kßstxz]
SFX DC 0 st         nd
SFX DC 0 ste        nd
SFX DC 0 ster       nd
SFX DC 0 sten       nd
SFX DC 0 stem       nd
SFX DC 0 stes       nd
SFX DC 0 est        [^n]d
SFX DC 0 este       [^n]d
SFX DC 0 ester      [^n]d
SFX DC 0 esten      [^n]d
SFX DC 0 estem      [^n]d
SFX DC 0 estes      [^n]d
SFX DC lig eligst     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligste    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligster   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligsten   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligstem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC lig eligstes   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX DC erig rigst      [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigste     [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigster    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigsten    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigstem    [^hi]erig
SFX DC erig rigstes    [^hi]erig


SFX DE Y 1
SFX DE 0 e          .


SFX Df Y 4
SFX Df ph f          ph
SFX Df ph fen        ph
SFX Df phie fie        phie
SFX Df phie fien       phie


SFX DN Y 1
SFX DN 0 n          .


SFX DP Y 1
SFX DP 0 en         .


SFX Dp Y 26
SFX Dp auf äufe      auf
SFX Dp auf äufen     auf
SFX Dp aus äuser     [hH]aus
SFX Dp aus äusern    [hH]aus
SFX Dp arkt ärkte     [mM]arkt
SFX Dp arkt ärkten    [mM]arkt
SFX Dp ang änge      ang
SFX Dp ang ängen     ang
SFX Dp uß üße       uß
SFX Dp uß üßen      uß
SFX Dp oß öße       oß
SFX Dp oß ößen      oß
SFX Dp aum äume      aum
SFX Dp aum äumen     aum
SFX Dp ag äge       ag
SFX Dp ag ägen      ag
SFX Dp ug üge       ug
SFX Dp ug ügen      ug
SFX Dp all älle      all
SFX Dp all ällen     all
SFX Dp ass ässe      ass
SFX Dp ass ässen     ass
SFX Dp uss üsse      uss
SFX Dp uss üssen     uss
SFX Dp oss össe      oss
SFX Dp oss össen     oss
# last ...oss rules are for swiss de_CH only - but do not affect de_DE


SFX DR Y 3
SFX DR 0 er         [^e]
SFX DR 0 ern        [^e]
SFX DR 0 r          e


SFX DS Y 1
SFX DS 0 s          .


SFX Dq Y 2
SFX Dq 0 se        s
SFX Dq 0 sen       s


SFX DQ Y 1
SFX DQ 0 ses       s
#SFX DQ 0 se        s
#SFX DQ 0 sen       s


SFX DT Y 1
SFX DT 0 es         .


SFX DJ Y 12
SFX DJ n ung        [bgkpßsz]eln
SFX DJ n ungen      [bgkpßsz]eln
SFX DJ eln lung       eln
SFX DJ n ung        ern
SFX DJ en ung        en
SFX DJ eln lungen     eln
SFX DJ n ungen      ern
SFX DJ en ungen      en
SFX DJ 0 ung        [^n]
SFX DJ 0 ungen      [^n]
SFX DJ el lung       el
SFX DJ el lungen     el


SFX DB N 12
SFX DB n bar        e[lr]n
SFX DB n bare       e[lr]n
SFX DB n baren      e[lr]n
SFX DB n barer      e[lr]n
SFX DB n bares      e[lr]n
SFX DB n barem      e[lr]n
SFX DB en bar        en
SFX DB en bare       en
SFX DB en baren      en
SFX DB en barer      en
SFX DB en bares      en
SFX DB en barem      en


SFX DD Y 6
SFX DD 0 d          n
SFX DD 0 de         n
SFX DD 0 den        n
SFX DD 0 der        n
SFX DD 0 des        n
SFX DD 0 dem        n



SFX DW Y 5
SFX DW en 0          en
SFX DW n 0          [^e]n
SFX DW st 0          [^s]st
SFX DW t 0          sst
SFX DW t 0          [^s]t
