en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
abonnieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
adressieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
Aktivieren/DSDJDm
allgegenwärtig/DA
anbetreffen/DD
Anklang/DSDTDpDm
Anleger/DNDSDFDmDgDiDj
antiquar/DEDPDSDFDoDzDm
Ärgernis/DQDqDm
arktisch/DA
Assoziation/DPDm
attest/DEDSDTDPDoDzDm
aufführen/DBDDDIDXDY
Aufpasser/DFDNDSDm
aufschöss/DZDE
aufstauen/DDDIDXDY
Auftrag/DpDSDTDJDm
Aufzug/DSDpDTDmDiDj
ausrüster/DSDNDFDoDzDm
auswechseln/DBDDDIDXDY
Bass/DTDpDmDiDj
bayreuth/DRDSDoDzDm
bedacht/DADCDU
bedampfen/DBDDDIDODXDYDW
bedienen/DSDJDoDzDm
beengen/DSDJDoDzDm
Begräbnis/DQDqDmDiDj
Behältnis/DQDqDmDiDj
bekannt/DADCDLDU
bekennen/DDDIDXDW
Beschleunigen/DSDJDm
Besorgnis/DqDm
betreuer/DFDNDSDoDzDm
bieten/DDDIDVDXDW
Bild/DRDTDMDSDmDiDj
bildorientiert/DA
Bitbus/DQDqDm
bitter/DADCDL
bochum/DRDoDzDm
Bock/DSDTDmDiDj
borte/DNDoDzDm
bullauge/DNDSDoDzDm
Bündnis/DQDqDmDiDj
charmeur/DSDEDPDFDoDzDm
choreograf/DFDPDoDzDm
dazuführen/DDDIDX
Defekt/DSDEDPDTDm
dekomprimieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
Desinfizieren/DSDJDm
Diskus/DQDqDm
drucken/DBDDDIDVDXDYDW
Durchschuss/DTDpDm
dürrekatastrophe/DNDoDzDm
durstig/DADC
Ebenbild/DRDTDm
ehrgefühl/DSDoDzDm
eigen/DADL
Einverständnis/DQDqDmDiDj
Einwilligen/DSDJDm
einzeilig/DA
einzudecken/DD
emittent/DPDoDzDm
Entwurf/DSDTDm
Entzug/DSDTDpDm
entzünden/DBDDDIDODXDY
Ereignis/DQDqDmDiDj
erhoben/DADWDX
Erlebnis/DQDqDm
ermahnen/DSDJDoDzDm
ernst/DADCDL
Erzeugnis/DQDqDm
Esel/DNDSDMDm
esser/DNDSDFDoDzDm
ewig/DADL
exponentialgesetz/DEDTDPDoDzDm
fadenscheinig/DADC
färbemittel/DSDoDzDm
feilschen/DDDIDXDY
Film/DEDSDTDMDPDmDiDj
findelkind/DTDRDoDzDm
Flanke/DNDm
flippern/DDDIDXDYDW
Fortfall/DSDpDm
fruchten/DBDDDIDXDY
Fußgängerunterführung/DPDm
gebückt/DA
gefühlvoll/DADC
Geheimnis/DQDqDmDiDj
gelb/DADL
Geld/DEDRDTDSDmDiDj
gelegen/DADLDU
gelenk/DEDPDTDSDoDzDm
Geschichte/DNDMDm
Geständnis/DQDqDm
getreu/DADL
gevögelt/DADn
Gewerkschaftler/DFDNDSDm
gewöhnen/DSDJDoDzDm
gitter/DNDSDoDzDm
Gleichnis/DQDqDm
Godesberg/DRDm
grönländer/DFDNDoDzDm
häufig/DADC
Hautausschlag/DpDSDTDm
helot/DPDoDzDm
herauszukriegen/DD
herzen/DSDWDoDzDm
Hormon/DEDPDSDmDiDj
ideell/DADC
implantat/DSDTDEDPDoDzDm
Inkrementalzähler/DSDm
Inobhutnahme/DNDm
Insel/DNDMDmDiDj
kalkulator/DPDSDoDzDm
Kanadier/DFDNDSDm
karikieren/DDDIDODXDY
kleinbürgerlich/DADC
Kloß/DTDpDm
Klötze/DNDMDm
knick/DEDPDSDoDzDm
knüppeln/DDDIDXDYDW
kodieren/DIDXDYDDDODB
Kolonne/DNDm
konklave/DNDSDoDzDm
konversionsbedingung/DPDoDzDm
Kranz/DTDmDiDj
kripobeamte/DNDRDoDzDm
Kürbis/DQDqDm
laut/DADCDL
Licht/DRDSDMDTDmDiDj
linkssozialistisch/DA
Lücke/DNDm
ludwigsfelde/DSDRDoDzDm
machtlos/DADC
magengeschwür/DEDPDSDTDoDzDm
Mahlerzeugnis/DQDqDm
makler/DNDSDFDoDzDm
Markt/DTDpDSDmDiDj
Minderzahl/DPDm
motorisieren/DDDIDODXDY
Mütter/DNDMDm
Nachfüllbehälter/DNDSDm
negieren/DBDDDIDODXDY
nerz/DEDPDTDoDzDm
neuer/DL
Niederschlag/DpDSDm
niederwerfen/DSDJDoDzDm
Omnibus/DQDqDmDiDj
Original/DEDPDSDmDiDj
Outsider/DNDSDFDm
pakistan/DRDSDoDzDm
Panzer/DNDSDmDiDj
partizipationsmöglichkeit/DPDoDzDm
passiv/DADC
pensionsberechtigt/DA
Pinzette/DNDm
posten/DSDWDoDzDm
problem/DEDPDSDMDoDzDm
Räderwerk/DEDPDSDm
rain/DEDPDSDoDzDm
Regisseur/DEDPDSDFDm
Rekord/DEDPDSDTDRDmDiDj
rücksetzen/DIDXDYDD
ruppig/DADC
Sakkoanzug/DSDTDpDm
scheit/DEDPDTDoDzDm
schimmelpilz/DEDPDTDoDzDm
schloss/DTDMDoDzDm
schnupftuch/DTDoDzDm
Schoßhund/DEDPDSDTDm
schreibschützen/DIDXDYDDDB
schwätzer/DFDNDSDoDzDm
sekundär/DADkDe
Selbständige/DRDNDm
simpel/DADC
Sold/DEDPDSDTDm
Sopranist/DFDPDm
spannen/DDDIDVDXDYDW
Spross/DEDPDTDm
städte/DNDMDoDzDm
Stiftsfest/DEDPDSDTDm
Strang/DSDTDpDm
stück/DEDPDSDTDMDoDzDm
Suggestionsbedürfnis/DQDqDm
Teelicht/DEDSDm
Theoretisieren/DSDJDm
tiefkühlkosthersteller/DNDSDoDzDm
Transkript/DSDTDEDPDm
treulos/DADC
trittbrett/DRDSDoDzDm
tumultuant/DPDFDoDzDm
überreich/DADL
umgegraben/DA
Unglück/DEDPDSDTDm
unsäglich/DADC
unterscheiden/DBDDDIDX
unterstrichen/DADWDX
untier/DEDPDSDTDMDoDzDm
Unverständnis/DQDqDm
vag/DA
ventil/DEDPDSDoDzDm
verallgemeinern/DBDDDIDODXDY
Verhältnis/DQDqDm
Verleiten/DSDJDm
Vermächtnis/DQDqDm
verschieden/DADCDL
voranstellen/DBDDDIDXDY
vorausgesehen/DA
Vorkommnis/DQDqDm
Vorlesungsverzeichnis/DQDqDm
wahr/DADCDLDU
Wall/DSDpDm
wermutstropfen/DSDoDzDm
wiener/DFDSDoDzDm
Wirtshaus/DTDpDm
wohlangebracht/DADC
wülste/DNDoDzDm
wüstling/DEDPDSDoDzDm
zappeln/DDDIDXDYDW
zerbrechen/DDDI
Zerrbild/DRDTDm
zieren/DDDIDVDXDYDW
Zuführen/DSDJDm
zusammengebracht/DA
